csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_CNJ_n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: wanishinziiwaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: wanishinziiwegwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: wanishinziiwanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: wanishinziinigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: wanishinziiwaagwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: wanishinziinigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: wanishinziigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: wanishinziiwaangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: wanishinziiwangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: wanishinziiwiingen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: wanishinowaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: wanishinowegwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: wanishinowanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: wanishininigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: wanishinowaagwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: wanishininigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: wanishinogwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: wanishinowaangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: wanishinowangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: wanishinowiingen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: wanishinziiwaambaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: wanishinziiwegibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: wanishinziiwambanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: wanishinziinigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinziiwaagobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: wanishinziinigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: wanishinziigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: wanishinziiwaangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: wanishinziiwangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: wanishinziiwiingibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: wanishinowaambaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: wanishinowegibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: wanishinowambanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: wanishininigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinowaagobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: wanishininigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: wanishinogobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: wanishinowaangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: wanishinowangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: wanishinowiingibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: wanishinziwaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: wanishinziweg
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: wanishinziwan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: wanishinzinig
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: wanishinzigwaa
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: wanishinzinig
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: wanishinzig
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: wanishinziwaang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: wanishinziwang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: wanishinzing
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: wanishinaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: wanishineg
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: wanishinan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: wanishininid
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: wanishinowaad
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: wanishininid
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: wanishing
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: wanishinaang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: wanishinang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: wanishining
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: wanishinziwaambaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: wanishinziwegiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: wanishinziwamban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: wanishinzinigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinzigwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: wanishinzinigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: wanishinzigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: wanishinziwaangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: wanishinziwangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: wanishinzingiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: wanishinaambaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: wanishinegiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: wanishinamban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: wanishininipan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinowaapan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: wanishininipan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: wanishingiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: wanishinaangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: wanishinangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: wanishiningiban
